Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.015

Forms.

The director may prescribe under this chapter such forms as the director deems appropriate for use by a mutual savings bank seeking to convert to a capital stock savings bank pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1994 c 92 s 350; 1981 c 85 s 2.]